tools/spellcheckers/strings.default.regex
# edits that are so specific we may allow them to occur any number of times
# (they will occur only once or twice anyway)
[
! Refinement round: corpus-attested chunk repairs.
{tor} (->) {tevrr}::1 ,
{oži} (->) {ohi}::1 ,
{ock} (->) {okk}::1 ,
{nuč} (->) {noč}::1 ,
{htar} (->) {hter}::1 ,
{mánni} (->) {manni}::1 ,
{ina} (->) {iidna}::10 ,
{sta} (->) {sda}::10 ,

{oi} (->) {oai}::1 ,

! ŋ digraph confusions, incl. consonant gradation written without ŋ
! (Jietnja→Jiekŋa, Mannjil→Maŋŋil, duodnjan→duogŋan)
{tnj} (->) {kŋ}::1 ,
{nnj} (->) {ŋŋ}::1 ,
{dnj} (->) {gŋ}::1 ,
{nj} (->) {ŋ}::1 ,
{ŋ} (->) {nj}::1 ,

! -riika compounds abbreviated (Olgorit- → Olgoriika-)
{rit} (->) {riika}::1 ,

{cvc} (->) {včč}::1 ,
{cvc} (->) {vcc}::1 ,

{x} (->) {ks}::1 ,

{ie} (->) {ea}::1 ,
{uo} (->) {oa}::1 ,

{jotla} (->) {johkala}::1 ,
{johla} (->) {johkala}::1 ,
{johtla} (->) {johkala}::1 ,

{or} (->) {evr}::1 ,
{ør} (->) {evr}::1 ,
{ör} (->) {evr}::1 ,


{ále} (->) {álii}::1 ,
{áli} (->) {álii}::1 ,
{ámi} (->) {áme}::1 ,
{eallii} (->) {ellii}::1 ,
{eje} (->) {e}::1 ,
{gi} (->) {giija}::1 ,
{riikka} (->) {rihká}::1 ,
{guimm} (->) { guimm}::1 ,
{guoibm} (->) { guoibm}::1 ,
{guoimm} (->) { guoimm}::1 ,
{gukt} (->) { gukt}::1 ,
{guovtt} (->) { guovtt}::1 ,
{guokt} (->) { guokt}::1 ,

{gáfej} (->) {kafé}::1 ,
{il} (->) {iila}::1 ,
{ilbme} (->) {ilmmi}::1 ,
{mi} (->) {miija}::1 ,
{oappeža} (->) {oappepaša}::1 ,
{ri} (->) {riija}::1 ,
{useum} (->) {usea}::1 ,
{šun} (->) {tion}::1 ,
{šon} (->) {tion}::1 ,
{unála} (->) {uvnnala}::1 ,
{onála} (->) {uvnnala}::1 ,
{ti} (->) {tiija}::1 ,
{uokt} (->) {uovtt}::1 ,
{uvra} (->) {ur}::1 ,
{vuohta} (->) {vuođa}::1 ,
{áđii} (->) {áđijai}::1 ,
{enšun} (->) {ension}::1 ,
{oant} (->) {ont}::1 ,
{eanoh} (->) {eahnoh}::1,

! å is not part of the North Sámi orthography; it reaches sme text through
! Norwegian/Swedish loans and Norwegianized or cross-Sámi place-name spellings
{å} (->) {o}::1 ,

! Norwegian/Swedish loan patterns
{ær} (->) {eara}::1 ,
{asje} (->) {áša}::1 ,
{šunal} (->) {tionála}::1 ,
{finans} (->) {finánsa}::1 ,
{emanta} (->) {emeanta}::1 ,
{kvadrat} (->) {kvadráhta}::1 ,

! dittography and haplology
{štašt} (->) {št}::1 ,
{uvvojuvvoj} (->) {uvvoj}::1 ,
{káš} (->) {kásaš}::1 ,
{ddj} (->) {dj}::1 ,

! hyphenated-compound repair
{-} (->) 0::1 ,
{tter-} (->) {ter}::1 ,
{davás-} (->) {davve}::1 ,

{álbávla} (->) {álabálva}::1 ,

! colon-inflection repair: the dominant error is a wrongly repeated stem
! vowel after the colon (CD:ain -> CD:in), then whole-suffix drop (CD:a ->
! CD), and only rarely a spurious colon (Cup:a -> Cupa)
{:a} (->) {:}::1 ,
{:a} (->) 0::1 ,
{:a} (->) {a}::2 ,,

! postposition tails typed short (word-final only: "bealli" etc. untouched)
{beal} (->) {bealde}::1 || _ .#. ,,
{beal} (->) {beale}::1  || _ .#. ,,
! passive plural typed as infinitive; both are live endings so priced above
! any letter edit
{uvvet} (->) {uvvojit}::25 || _ .#. ,,
! superlative -seamos for -mus; both endings productive, same pricing logic
{seamos} (->) {mus}::25 || _ .#. ,,

! foreign-letter and loanword chunk repairs (the left side never occurs in
! correct North Sámi text, so these ride at 1 like the å rule above)
{ä} (->) {ea}::1 ,,
{ä} (->) {a}::1 ,,
{ð} (->) {đ}::1 ,,
{járvv} (->) {jávrr}::1 ,,
{ázah} (->) {áhc}::1 ,,
{áfe} (->) {afé}::1 ,,
{fej} (->) {fé}::1 ,,
{niála} (->) {ánala}::1 ,,
{iljjo} (->) {eliu}::1 ,,
{aigge} (->) {áige}::1 ,,
{ihle} (->) {illi}::1 ,,
{ruokto} (->) {ruovttu}::1 ,,
{sahpo} (->) {sáppa}::1 ,,

! chunks whose left side does appear in correct words: reachable but priced
! above any letter edit
{mor} (->) {movra}::25 ,,
{ášuvnna} (->) {eren}::25 ,,
{otti} (->) {odde}::25 ,,

! Norwegian/Swedish -sjon loan chunks distorted on the way into Sámi
! (complement of the {šun}->{tion} set above, which runs the other way)
{átio} (->) {ašun}::1 ,
{áksio} (->) {akšu}::1 ,
{áves} (->) {akš}::25 ,

! loan/compound haplology and stray-syllable repairs
{dabbo} (->) {bu}::1 ,
{hansá} (->) {sa}::1 ,
{anial} (->) {on}::1 ,
{perme} (->) {parteme}::1 ,
{ieđu} (->) 0::25 ,
{ekku} (->) {ggo}::1 ,
{aur} (->) {ávrr}::1 ,

! -vdn- cluster written without the v or the d
{uvna} (->) {uvdna}::1 ,
{ádni} (->) {ávdni}::1 ,,

! truncated place-name generics (word-final only)
{jár} (->) {jávrri}::1 || _ .#. ,,
{joht} (->) {johka}::1 || _ .#. ,,

! Slavic/Norwegian -sk adjectival dropped in the Sámi exonym; some exonyms
! legitimately keep the sk (Petrozavodskas), hence 25
{ska} (->) {a}::25 || _ .#. ,,
{skas} (->) {as}::25 || _ .#. ,,

! misc word-final chunk repairs
{fn} (->) {lf}::1 || _ .#. ,,
{Ra} (->) {R}::1 || _ .#. ,,
{ájat} (->) {át}::25 || _ .#. ,,
{aŧ} (->) {á}::1 || _ .#. ,,
{ális} (->) {al}::25 || _ .#.


]
;
